New Jersey, session 222, S558.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Authority means the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority. Eligible tuition expenses means tuition expenses that were incurred by a program participant in attending an accredited advanced practice nurse program, and which were not covered by any grants or scholarships. Home health care services means nursing and other home health care services rendered at a patients place of residence. Program means the tuition reimbursement program for advanced practice nurses established pursuant to this act. Program participant means an individual who is certified by the New Jersey Board of Nursing as an advanced practice nurse, and who contracts with the authority to provide home health care services in return for tuition reimbursement provided under the program. 2.    a.  There is established in the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority a tuition reimbursement program for advanced practice nurses who provide home health care services. The program shall provide reimbursement to program participants for a portion of the eligible tuition expenses incurred by the participant in attending an accredited advanced practice nurse program. b.    A program participant shall enter into a contract with the authority for a specified number of one-year periods of service, up to four years, in which the participant agrees to engage in the full-time practice of providing home health care services in the State.  The agreement shall specify the program participants dates of required service and the total amount of reimbursement of eligible tuition expenses to be received by the participant in return for service. c.     The tuition reimbursement for a participant under the program shall equal 25 percent of the participants eligible tuition expenses for the one academic year of an advanced practice nurse program in which tuition was the lowest, in return for each full year of service satisfactorily completed by the participant under the program.  The total tuition reimbursement amount for a program participant, for four full years of service, shall not exceed 100 percent of the participants eligible tuition expenses for the one academic year of an advanced practice nurse program in which tuition was the lowest. 3.    To be eligible to participate in the program, an applicant shall: a.     be a resident of New Jersey; b.    be certified by the New Jersey Board of Nursing as an advanced practice nurse; c.     have received specialized education or training in providing home health care services; d.    apply for the program within one year of obtaining certification as an advanced practice nurse; and e.     agree to engage in the full-time practice of providing home health care services in the State for a period of one to four years in return for the tuition reimbursement provided under the program. 4.    The contract entered into between a program participant and the authority pursuant to section 2 of this act shall require a program participant to: a.     charge for professional services at the usual and customary rate prevailing in the area in which the patient resides, but allow a patient who is unable to pay that charge to pay at a reduced rate or receive care at no charge; b.    not discriminate against any patient in the provision of home health care services on the basis of that persons ability to pay or source of payment; and c.     agree not to impose any charge in excess of the limiting fee for a service, as determined by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, to a recipient of benefits under the federal Medicare program established pursuant to Pub.L.89-97 (42 U.S.C. s.1395 et seq.). 5.    A program participant, as a condition of participation, shall be required to adhere to performance standards established by the authority.  The standards shall include, but not be limited to, requirements that a program participant: a.     maintain residency in the State; b.    maintain certification to practice as an advanced practice nurse in the State; c.     remain current with payments on any student loans; d.    maintain satisfactory performance of services; and e.     report to the authority, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the authority, on the program participants performance of services rendered prior to reimbursement of tuition under the program. 6.    An individual who is participating in the Primary Care Practitioner Loan Redemption Program, N.J.S.18A:71C-32 et seq., or in the federally administered National Health Service Corps Loan Repayment Program, section 338B of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. s.254l-1), shall not be eligible to participate simultaneously in the tuition reimbursement program established pursuant to this act. 7.    The authority shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 8.    This act shall take effect immediately.